Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1365XS (1) 91 cm/ns S.F. 18 Section 1. Section 607A.5, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 607A.5 Automatic excuse from jury service. 3 1. A person shall be excused from jury service if the 4 person submits written documentation verifying, to the courtâs 5 satisfaction, that the person is solely responsible for the 6 daily care of a person with a permanent disability living 7 in the personâs household and that the performance of juror 8 service would cause substantial risk of injury to the health of 9 the person with a disability, or that the person is the mother 10 of a breastfed child and is responsible for the daily care of 11 the child. However, if the person is regularly employed at a 12 location other than the personâs household, the person shall 13 not be excused under this section subsection . 14 2. A person shall be excused from jury service if the 15 person submits written documentation verifying, to the courtâs 16 satisfaction, that the person is at least seventy-five years 17 of age. 18